Tennessee, session 114, SB1266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-2-604(d), is amended by
deleting the language "twenty-first" and substituting "twenty-third".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-2-604(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(c) The extension of foster care services may be provided on a voluntary basis
to a young adult who was in the custody of the department at the time of the young
adult's eighteenth birthday or a young adult who was adopted from, or approved for
subsidized permanent guardianship by, the department and was at least sixteen (16)
years of age but less than eighteen (18) years of age at the time of adoption or
approval for subsidized permanent guardianship. A young adult who satisfies either
criterion may, from eighteen (18) years of age until twenty-three (23) years of age,
receive extension of foster care services if the young adult is:
(1) Completing secondary education or a program leading to an
equivalent credential;
(2) Enrolled in an institution that provides postsecondary or career or
technical education;
(3) Participating in a program or activity designed to promote
employment or remove barriers to employment;
(4) Employed for at least eighty (80) hours per month; or
SB1266
001207
- 1 -

(5) Incapable of doing any of the activities in subdivisions (c)(1)-(4) due
to a medical condition, including a developmental or intellectual condition, which
inability is supported by regularly updated information in the young adult's
permanency plan. In such a case, the young adult must be in compliance with
a course of treatment as recommended by the department.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-2-604(e)(4), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(4) If the young adult did not achieve permanency through adoption or
subsidized permanent guardianship, attend a court hearing or administrative review
every six (6) months until reaching twenty-one (21) years of age.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-179, is amended by deleting
"a minimum of five (5) public institutions" and substituting "participating institutions" and by
deleting "public" wherever it appears and substituting "participating".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-179, is amended by deleting
subsection (d).
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-312, is amended by deleting
subsection (h) and substituting:
(h) A person must not be charged a fee for issuance, renewal, or reinstatement
of a driver license, instruction permit, intermediate driver license, or photo identification
card if the person's application is accompanied by evidence that the person is:
(1) Under eighteen (18) years of age and in the custody of the
department of children's services; or
(2) Receiving services under the department of children's services
extension of foster care program or juvenile justice programs.
SECTION 7. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001207